Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-4,153
Issuance of license; department;
duties.

Prior to the issuance of any original or renewal
commercial driver's license or the reissuance of any commercial driver's license
with a change of any classification, endorsement, or restriction, the department shall, within twenty-four
hours prior to issuance if the applicant does not currently possess a valid
commercial driver's license issued by this state and within ten days prior
to the issuance or reissuance for all other applicants:

(1) Check the driving record of the applicant as maintained by the department
or by any other state which has issued an operator's license to the applicant;

(2) Contact the Commercial Driver License Information System to determine
whether the applicant possesses any valid commercial driver's license issued
by any other state, whether such license or the applicant's privilege to operate
a commercial motor vehicle has been suspended, revoked, or canceled, or whether
the applicant has been disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle;
and

(3) Contact the National Driver Register to determine if the applicant
(a) has been disqualified from operating any motor vehicle, (b) has had an
operator's license suspended, revoked, or canceled for cause in the three-year
period ending on the date of application, (c)
has been convicted of operation of a motor vehicle while under the influence
of or while impaired by alcohol or a controlled substance, a traffic violation
arising in connection with a fatal traffic accident, reckless driving, racing
on the highways, failure to render aid or provide identification when involved
in an accident which resulted in a fatality or personal injury, or perjury
or the knowledgeable making of a false affidavit or statement to officials
in connection with activities governed by a law, rule, or regulation related
to the operation of a motor vehicle,
(d) is not eligible, or (e) is deceased.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 103;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 36;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 17.